Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.420

Commission merchant's report of sale to consignor.

When requested by a consignor, a commission merchant shall promptly make available to the consignor or to the director all records of the ongoing sales of the consignor's agricultural products showing the amount sold, the selling price, and any other information required under RCW 20.01.370.

[ 1991 c 109 s 22; 1959 c 139 s 42.]